Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 2-4-107, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-4-107. A. 1. The salary of the director and other
employees of the bureau and any detention home established pursuant
to Section 2-4-108 of this title shall be fixed by the judge of the
Juvenile Division, subject to the general administrative authority
of the county commissioners of the contracting county. The salary
of the director shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of salaries of
county Class A officers.
2. The salary of any other employee of the juvenile bureau
shall not exceed eighty-five percent (85%) of Class A county
officers.
B. The judge of the Juvenile Division, subject to the general
administrative authority of the county commissioners of the
contracting county, may fix a limit on the amount of expenses that
may be incurred by the director and assistants to the director, such
limit to be in the judgment of the judge adequate to care for the
expenses necessary to carrying out the orders of the court in an
efficient and expedient manner. The director and assistants to the

director and other personnel of the court shall keep and maintain
their offices at the place where the office of the judge of the
court is kept, unless the judge of the Juvenile Division, subject to
the general administrative authority of the county commissioners of
the contracting county, shall direct otherwise. The offices of the
director and assistants to the director shall contain adequate
equipment, desk space and consultation rooms necessary for
appropriate office procedure.
C. In addition to their salaries, the director and assistants
to the director shall be reimbursed at the same rate as state
employees for mileage traveled by them in the investigation of court
cases and in supervising probationers. The director and assistants
may also receive reimbursement, at the rate and in the manner
applicable to other county officers, for actual and necessary
expenses incurred by them in attending conferences, meetings,
seminars or official business of the court either within or outside
of the State of Oklahoma.
D. In all counties having a juvenile bureau, the budget of the
juvenile bureau for salaries and expenses of the director,
counselors and other employees shall be established and funded as
follows:
1. All expenses incurred in complying with the provisions of
this article shall be a county charge or funded by a special sales
tax dedicated to juvenile programs and expenses;
2. The salaries and other compensation of all employees of the
juvenile bureau shall be fixed by the judge within the limit of the
total appropriations therefor; and
3. It is made the duty of the county excise board to make the
necessary appropriation and levy for the payment of salaries of the
director and all other employees, together with the expenses of
administering the bureau, consistent with the duty to do likewise
with the budget estimates of other county officers under the board's
jurisdiction, as required by the Constitution and laws of this
state.
4. Except in instances where it is entitled to representation
because of insurance coverage, the district attorney of the county
in which the juvenile bureau is located shall represent the juvenile
bureau and any employee who was acting in his or her official
capacity at the time of the act or omission complained of in any
ENR. H. B. NO. 1579 Page 2

lawsuit. If the district attorney has a conflict of interest or
otherwise declines to represent the juvenile bureau or its
employees, the county commissioners may request the assistance of
the Attorney General or authorize the employment of private counsel
for the juvenile bureau and its employees in their official
capacity.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1579 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1579 Page 4